Illinois, session 104th, HB2094.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Sustainable Investing Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 238/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Sustainable Investing Act.9(Source: P.A. 101-473, eff. 1-1-20.)